Washington statutes.
RCW 18.100.060

Rendering of services by authorized individuals.

(1) No corporation organized under this chapter may render professional services except through individuals who are duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render such professional services within this state. However, nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted to:

(a) Prohibit a person duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render professional services in any jurisdiction other than this state from becoming a member of a professional corporation in this state organized for the purpose of rendering the same professional services;

(b) Prohibit a professional corporation from rendering services outside this state through individuals who are not duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render professional services within this state; or

(c) Require the licensing of clerks, secretaries, bookkeepers, technicians, and other assistants employed by a professional corporation who are not usually and ordinarily considered by custom and practice to be rendering professional services to the public for which a license or other legal authorization is required.

(2) Persons engaged in a profession and otherwise meeting the requirements of this chapter may operate under this chapter as a professional corporation so long as each shareholder personally engaged in the practice of the profession in this state is duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to practice the profession in this state and:

(a) At least one officer and one director of the corporation is duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to practice the profession in this state; or

(b) Each officer in charge of an office of the corporation in this state is duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to practice the profession in this state.

[ 1998 c 293 s 1; 1983 c 51 s 3; 1969 c 122 s 6.]